District of Columbia statutes.
31-4425

Voting powers under group policies.

In every group policy issued by a domestic life company the employer shall be deemed to be the policyholder for all purposes, within the meaning of this chapter, and, if entitled to vote at meetings of the company, shall be entitled to 1 vote thereat.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1150, ch. 672, ch. III, § 25
1981 Ed., § 35-625.
1973 Ed., § 35-525.